apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="नकल__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ें</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ख/ाँ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ाँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r>ाँ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="वध/ू__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुएँ</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुयें</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जु/आ__n_m">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="बिटि/आ__n_f">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>आँ</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ओं</l><r>आ<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="क/ई__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="अडबंग__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="खुशब/ू__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुएँ</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुयें</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुओं</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कला/ई__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयाँ</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>इयों</l><r>ई<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->        

    <pardef n="गलत__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="बालक__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="जड__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ऐसी/आ__adj">
      <e><p><l>आ</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ए</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ई</l><r>आ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="कुछ__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ों</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="स/ा__adj">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="भ्रातावधू"><i>भ्रातावध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अडबंग"><i>अडबंग</i><par n="अडबंग__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नकल"><i>नकल</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="गुरुभाई"><i>गुरुभा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गफलत"><i>गफलत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रजाई"><i>रजा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="दाई"><i>दा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="हकीकत"><i>हकीकत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बलवाई"><i>बलवा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कलाई"><i>कला</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="तफतीश"><i>तफतीश</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="शुक्तिवधू"><i>शुक्तिवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मियाँ"><i>मिय</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="तमाशाई"><i>तमाशा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरात"><i>खैरात</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="अधपई"><i>अधप</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="रोयाँ"><i>रोय</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="महासभाई"><i>महासभा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="पतोहू"><i>पतोह</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भई"><i>भ</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सूई"><i>सू</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कुलवधू"><i>कुलवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खाँ"><i>ख</i><par n="ख/ाँ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="लंबाई"><i>लंबा</i><par n="कला/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सेँवई"><i>सेँव</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बहनोई"><i>बहनो</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="महाचमू"><i>महाचम</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="भाई"><i>भा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="कमान"><i>कमान</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बडा"><i>बड</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडे"><i>बडे</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जोरू"><i>जोर</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बर्फ"><i>बर्फ</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="सलाई"><i>सला</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खैरियत"><i>खैरियत</i><par n="नकल__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="बिटिआ"><i>बिटि</i><par n="बिटि/आ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="पुत्रवधू"><i>पुत्रवध</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ननदोई"><i>ननदो</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="चारपाई"><i>चारपा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="खुशबू"><i>खुशब</i><par n="खुशब/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="आरजू"><i>आरज</i><par n="वध/ू__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="डाई"><i>डा</i><par n="/ई__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="कसाई"><i>कसा</i><par n="क/ई__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="जुआ"><i>जु</i><par n="जु/आ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="वाक्प्रसारीआ"><i>वाक्प्रसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सामोद"><i>सामोद</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फुसफुसा"><i>फुसफुस</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ताजीआ"><i>ताजी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चलायमान"><i>चलायमान</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हलका"><i>हलक</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूखीआ"><i>सूखी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="श्रममोहित"><i>श्रममोहित</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गरम"><i>गरम</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अनेक"><i>अनेक</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अच्छा"><i>अच्छा</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बडीआ"><i>बडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अकर्णक"><i>अकर्णक</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रसीला"><i>रसील</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छमछम"><i>छमछम</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धर्मपरायण"><i>धर्मपरायण</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नितांत"><i>नितांत</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जैसा"><i>जैस</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बूडीआ"><i>बूडी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अश्वारूढ"><i>अश्वारूढ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नष्टचित्त"><i>नष्टचित्त</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्यादा"><i>ज्याद</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उठल्लूआ"><i>उठल्लू</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खुश"><i>खुश</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नाजुकमिजाज"><i>नाजुकमिजाज</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ऋणकर्ता"><i>ऋणकर्त</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माध्यम"><i>माध्यम</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असंयुक्त"><i>असंयुक्त</i><par n="जड__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बालक"><i>बालक</i><par n="बालक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुराना"><i>पुराना</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछ"><i>कुछ</i><par n="कुछ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असंसारीआ"><i>असंसारी</i><par n="ऐसी/आ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पिछला"><i>पिछल</i><par n="स/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठंडा"><i>ठंडा</i><par n="गलत__adj"/></e>
